Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.210

Converted savings bank prohibited from repurchasing its stock without approval.

No converted savings bank may repurchase any of its capital stock from any person unless the repurchase is approved by the director either in advance or at the time of repurchase.

[ 1994 c 92 s 362; 1985 c 56 s 21; 1981 c 85 s 41.]